Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.120

Quorum requirements—Compensation—Travel expenses.

(1) A majority of the voting members constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and for carrying out the duties of the commission.

(2) A member of the commission shall not receive any salary or other compensation from the commission, except that each member of the commission is compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 for each day spent in actual attendance at or traveling to and from meetings of the commission or on special assignments for the commission, together with subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Employees of the commission also may be reimbursed subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 when on official commission business.

[ 2009 c 33 s 12.]